Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-8006
Violations; unfair trade practice; civil penalty.

An individual or business enterprise who violates section 71-8004 or 71-8005 commits an unfair trade practice. Any person or entity injured by such a violation shall have a right of action against the violator for damages for each occurrence when any person or entity suffered or suffers loss.

An individual or business enterprise that violates the Certified Industrial Hygienist Title Protection Act shall be subject to a civil penalty of not more than two thousand dollars. The Attorney General or the county attorney of the county in which such violation occurs shall, when he or she has knowledge of such violation, institute an action in such county to collect the penalty imposed by this section. Money collected pursuant to such action shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the permanent school fund.

Laws 1997, LB 558, § 6.